District of Columbia statutes.
48-833.06

Penalty.

This subchapter may be enforced in a civil action brought by the Corporation Counsel. A manufacturer or labeler that fails to provide a report as required by this subchapter commits a civil violation for which a fine of $1,000 plus costs and attorney’s fees may be adjudged.

History

May 18, 2004, D.C. Law 15-164, § 306, 51 DCR 3688